fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Aliments > Produits à grignoter > Fruits à grignoter: Collations aux fruits lyophilisés; Bonbons gélifiés aux fruits; Cuirs et rouleaux de fruits
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Είδη διατροφής > Τροφές σνακ > Σνακ με φρούτα: Σνακ από λυοφιλοποιημένα φρούτα; Ζελεδάκια φρούτων; Ρολά από πάστα φρούτων
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Alimenti > Stuzzichini e snack > Snack di frutta: Snack di frutta liofilizzata; Snack gommosi alla frutta; Rotoli e strisce di frutta
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Lebensmittel > Vorspeisen & Snacks > Fruchtsnacks: Gefriergetrocknete Fruchtsnacks; Fruchtgummis; Fruchtleder & Fruchtrollen
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Alimentos > Entremeses y aperitivos > Golosinas de frutas: Snacks de frutas liofilizadas; Gomitas de frutas; Rollitos y tiras de fruta
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Voedselitems > Voorgerechten en snacks > Fruitsnacks: Gevriesdroogde fruitsnacks; Fruitgummy's; Fruitleer en fruitrolletjes
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Hàng thực phẩm > Thức ăn nhẹ > Đồ ăn vặt làm từ hoa quả: Snack trái cây sấy thăng hoa; Kẹo dẻo trái cây; Kẹo dẻo cuộn trái cây
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Żywność > Przekąski > Przekąski owocowe: Przekąski z liofilizowanych owoców; Żelki owocowe; Przekąski owocowe w paskach
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Ruokatuotteet > Välipalat > Hedelmävälipalat: Kylmäkuivatut hedelmävälipalat; Hedelmäviinikumit; Hedelmänauhat ja -rullat
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Хранителни продукти > Храни за междинна закуска > Плодови закуски: Лиофилизирани плодови закуски; Плодови желирани бонбони; Плодова кожа и рулца
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Maisto prekės > Užkandžiai > Vaisių užkandžiai: Liofilizuoti vaisių užkandžiai; Vaisių guminukai; Vaisių odelės ir ritinėliai
ja: 食品・飲料 > 食品 > 軽食・スナック > フルーツグミ: フリーズドライフルーツスナック; フルーツグミ; フルーツレザー・ロール
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Matvarer > Snacksmat > Fruktsnacks: Frysetørket fruktsnacks; Fruktvingummi; Fruktremser og ruller
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 食品 > 零食 > 水果味零食: 冻干水果零食; 水果软糖; 果丹皮和水果卷
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > รายการอาหาร > อาหารว่าง > ขนมรสผลไม้: ผลไม้อบกรอบ; กัมมี่ผลไม้; ผลไม้กวนแบบแผ่นและแบบม้วน
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Prehrambeni artikli > Grickalice > Voćne grickalice: Grickalice od liofiliziranog voća; Voćni gumeni bomboni; Voćna koža i rolice
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Food Items > Snack Foods > Fruit Snacks: Freeze-Dried Fruit Snacks; Fruit Gummies; Fruit Leather & Rolls
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Пищевые продукты > Снеки > Фруктовые снеки: Снэки из сублимированных фруктов; Фруктовые жевательные конфеты; Фруктовая пастила и роллы
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Livsmedel > Snacks > Fruktsnacks: Frystorkade fruktsnacks; Fruktgummin; Fruktremmar & fruktsnören
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 식품 > 간식 > 과일 간식: 동결 건조 과일 스낵; 과일 구미; 과일 레더 및 롤
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Prehrambeni izdelki > Prigrizki > Sadni prigrizki: Prigrizki iz liofiliziranega sadja; Sadni gumiji; Sadno usnje in zvitki
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse alimentare > Gustări > Gustări cu fructe: Gustări din fructe liofilizate; Gume de fructe; Coajă de fructe și rulouri din fructe
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 食品 > 零食 > 水果軟糖: 凍乾水果零食; 水果軟糖; 水果軟糖條與水果捲
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Potraviny > Slané pochutiny > Ovocné občerstvenie: Lyofilizované ovocné občerstvenie; Ovocné gumové cukríky; Ovocná koža a rolky
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Fødevarer > Mellemmåltider > Frugtslik: Frysetørrede frugtsnacks; Frugtvingummier; Frugtlæder og frugtruller
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Potraviny > Svačiny a pochutiny > Ovocné svačiny: Lyofilizované ovocné snacky; Ovocné gumové bonbony; Ovocné kůže a rolky
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Élelmiszertételek > Snack ételek > Gyümölcs snackek: Liofilizált gyümölcs nasik; Gyümölcsös gumicukrok; Gyümölcsbőrök és -tekercsek
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Yiyecek Çeşitleri > Atıştırmalıklar > Meyveli Atıştırmalıklar: Dondurularak kurutulmuş meyve atıştırmalıkları; Meyveli yumuşak şekerler; Pestil ve meyve ruloları
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Artigos alimentares > Snacks > Snacks de fruta: Snacks de fruta liofilizada; Gomas de fruta; Rolos e tiras de fruta
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Alimentos > Aperitivos e petiscos > Lanches de frutas: Snacks de frutas liofilizadas; Gomas de frutas; Rolinhos e tiras de frutas